Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Tennessee Claims Commission

9-8-301. Creation.

There is hereby created an administrative tribunal consisting of three (3) members, one (1) from each grand division, known as the “Tennessee claims commission.”

For administrative purposes, the commission shall be attached to the treasury department. The administrative responsibilities of the commission shall be performed by the state treasurer, in consultation with the claims commission and under the oversight of the board of claims. The state treasurer is authorized to delegate to the administrative clerk such of these responsibilities as the state treasurer deems appropriate.

The authority to appoint, terminate and control the staff of the commission shall rest with the state treasurer; provided, that the individual claims commissioners may appoint, terminate and control the staff personnel assigned to their respective offices. All decisions relative to compensation of the staff of the commission, including the staff positions assigned to the individual commissioners, shall be subject to the approval of the state treasurer. The individual claims commissioners shall consult with the state treasurer prior to taking any personnel action with respect to the staff personnel assigned to their respective offices, and the state treasurer shall consult with the members of the claims commission prior to taking any personnel action for all other staff of the commission.

The employees shall not have state service status but shall be subject to personnel policies and regulations which are applicable to employees of the treasury department, such as leave, compensation, classification and travel requests.

Notwithstanding any provision of Acts 1997, ch. 165, to the contrary, the autonomy of individual claims commissioners in performing their claims adjudication function shall be respected by the state treasurer and the board of claims. Nothing within that act shall be construed to give the state treasurer or board of claims authority to supervise or take any personal actions with regard to the individual claims commissioners.

For the purposes of this part and part 4 of this chapter, “grand division of the state” shall be defined as such term is defined in title 4, chapter 1, part 2, except that Cumberland County shall be included within the middle grand division.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 1; 1997, ch. 165, §§ 2, 11; 2003, ch. 411, § 1; 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee claims commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (d), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Acts 1997, ch. 165, referred to in this section, rewrote this section, amended §§9-8-304,9-8-305,9-8-403 and9-8-405, and added §9-8-309.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

State Liability at the Tennessee Claims Commission: Balancing Sovereign Immunity and Individual Rights of Redress (Steven W. Feldman), 37 Tenn. B.J. 19 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Claims Commission is part of the executive branch of the government. A Tennessee claims commissioner is not a member of the judiciary and employees of the claims commission and claims commissioners are subject to T.C.A. §2-19-207. OAG 13-111, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (12/30/13).

9-8-302. Appointments — Terms — Residence — Vacancies — Chair.

Each commissioner shall be appointed by the governor with confirmation by resolution of both houses of the general assembly for a term of eight (8) years.

To provide staggered terms for the commissioners, the term expiring on June 30, 2003, shall be filled for an eight (8) year appointment while the current terms of the remaining two (2) commissioners shall each be extended for two (2) additional years. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be appointed to eight (8) year terms.

Each commissioner shall have resided in the grand division from which such commissioner is appointed for one (1) year prior to appointment, resided in Tennessee for five (5) years prior to appointment, and shall have been licensed to practice law in Tennessee for at least five (5) years prior to appointment. No commissioner may practice law while serving on the commission. The commissioners shall discontinue the practice of law as soon after their appointments as is practicable. The commissioners shall comply with the standards of conduct contained in the Code of Judicial Conduct of the Rules of the Tennessee Supreme Court.

The commissioners shall be eligible for reappointment.

Temporary vacancies on the commission shall be filled by a qualified person appointed by the governor. Any other vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the term by a qualified person appointed by the governor with the consent of both houses of the general assembly. If such a vacancy occurs while the general assembly is not in session, the governor shall appoint a qualified person to serve during the interim.

The commission shall designate one (1) of its members to serve as chair.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, §§ 2, 6; 1985, ch. 105, § 3; 1993, ch. 367, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 816, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 367, § 3 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to the term of each commissioner who is appointed and confirmed pursuant to this section and whose term commences on or after January 1, 1993.

Cross-References. Code of Judicial Conduct, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 10.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

9-8-303. Compensation.

The commissioners of the claims commission shall receive the same compensation as a Class 1 commissioner.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 3.

Cross-References. Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, §8-23-101.

9-8-304. Administrative clerk — Open proceedings — En banc hearings.

The claims commission, subject to the approval of the state treasurer, shall designate a commission employee to serve as administrative clerk to the claims commission. The administrative clerk, in consultation with the commission chair, shall schedule meetings of the commission.

The administrative clerk, in consultation with the commission chair, shall docket proceedings and schedule hearings on claims. Each claim shall be assigned to the appropriate commissioner for the grand division in which the wrongful act occurred or in which the claimant lives; provided, that the chair of the commission shall have the authority to assign cases arising in one grand division to a commissioner in another grand division if such is necessary to alleviate congestion, delay, or an imbalance in caseloads among grand divisions. Each claim shall be heard in the grand division in which the wrongful act occurred or in which the claimant lives. The commission shall follow the law established for trial courts concerning opening proceedings to the public.

The administrative clerk, in consultation with the state treasurer, is responsible for the day-to-day management of the commission's staff and such other activities as may be required including, but not limited to, reporting on the status of claims. In managing the affairs of the commission, the state treasurer shall consult with the claims commission.

For the purpose of uniformity, the commission, upon the request of two (2) members thereof, may sit en banc to hear and decide any matter for which there is a disagreement among two (2) or more of the commissioners.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 4; 1997, ch. 165, § 3.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

9-8-305. Powers and duties.

Each commissioner, and each administrative law judge assigned pursuant to this part, has the authority to:

Hear and determine claims against the state falling within the categories enumerated in § 9-8-307;

Issue subpoenas, swear in witnesses at hearings and other commission functions, effect discovery and issue protective orders and the like, and seek enforcement pursuant to § 4-5-311(a) and (b);

Rule on motions and objections;

Regulate the course of proceedings;

Take official notice of:

State statutes and the rules and regulations of state agencies; and

Any fact that can be judicially noticed; and

Issue written findings of facts and opinions of law.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 5; 1986, ch. 626, § 7; 1997, ch. 165, §§ 4, 5.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Claims Commission is part of the executive branch of the government. A Tennessee claims commissioner is not a member of the judiciary and employees of the claims commission and claims commissioners are subject to T.C.A. §2-19-207. OAG 13-111, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (12/30/13).

9-8-306. Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter in order for it to fulfill its duties in an orderly and efficient manner.

Acts 1984, ch. 972, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Claims Commission is part of the executive branch of the government. A Tennessee claims commissioner is not a member of the judiciary and employees of the claims commission and claims commissioners are subject to T.C.A. §2-19-207. OAG 13-111, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (12/30/13).